Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.210

Statewide transfer and articulation policies.

The council shall adopt statewide transfer and articulation policies that ensure efficient transfer of credits and courses across public two and four-year institutions of higher education. The intent of the policies is to create a statewide system of articulation and alignment between two and four-year institutions of higher education. Policies may address but are not limited to creation of a statewide system of course equivalency, creation of transfer associate degrees, statewide articulation agreements, applicability of technical courses toward baccalaureate degrees, and other issues. The institutions of higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges shall cooperate with the council in developing the statewide policies and shall provide support and staff resources as necessary to assist in maintaining the policies.

[ 2012 c 229 s 113; 2004 c 275 s 10; 1998 c 245 s 23; 1985 c 370 s 27; 1983 c 304 s 1. Formerly RCW 28B.76.240, 28B.80.280.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.